Massachusetts, session 194th, H196.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 16 of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the country, within three months of
enactment, the Executive Office of Health and Human Services shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and the committee on children, families, and persons with
disabilities specifying the resources the department of transitional assistance requires to assure
timely participation by eligible households in federal nutrition assistance benefits administered
by the department, provided that the report shall set forth (a) the department’s short- and long-
term goals for improving benefits access and providing timely customer service to eligible
households; and (b) the financial and other resources the department needs to reach those goals.
of 1